Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 9. SAFETY

SUBTITLE A. PUBLIC SAFETY

CHAPTER 752. HIGH VOLTAGE OVERHEAD LINES

Sec. 752.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "High voltage" means more than 600 volts measured between conductors or between a conductor and the ground.

(2) "Overhead line" means a bare or insulated electrical conductor installed above ground but does not include a conductor that is de-energized and grounded or that is enclosed in a rigid metallic conduit.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 752.002. EXEMPTION FOR CERTAIN EMPLOYEES AND ACTIVITIES. (a) This chapter does not apply to the construction, reconstruction, operation, or maintenance by an authorized person of overhead electrical or communication circuits or conductors and their supporting structures and associated equipment that are part of a rail transportation system, an electrical generating, transmission, or distribution system, or a communication system.

(b) In this section, "authorized person" means:

(1) an employee of a light and power company, an electric cooperative, or a municipality working on his employer's electrical system;

(2) an employee of a transportation system working on the system's electrical circuits;

(3) an employee of a communication utility;

(4) an employee of a state, county, or municipal agency that has authorized circuit construction on the poles or structures that belong to an electric power company, an electric cooperative, a municipal or transportation system, or a communication system;

(5) an employee of an industrial plant who works on the plant's electrical system; or

(6) an employee of an electrical or communications contractor who is working under the contractor's supervision.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 752.003. TEMPORARY CLEARANCE OF LINES. (a) A person, firm, corporation, or association responsible for temporary work or a temporary activity or function closer to a high voltage overhead line than the distances prescribed by this chapter must notify the operator of the line at least 48 hours before the work begins.

(b) A person, firm, corporation, or association may not begin the work, activity, or function under this section until the person, firm, corporation, or association responsible for the work, activity, or function and the owner or operator, or both, of the high voltage overhead line have negotiated a satisfactory mutual arrangement to provide temporary de-energization and grounding, temporary relocation or raising of the line, or temporary mechanical barriers to separate and prevent contact between the line and the material or equipment or the person performing the work, activity, or function.

(c) The person, firm, corporation, or association responsible for the work, activity, or function shall pay the operator of the high voltage overhead line the actual expense incurred by the operator in providing the clearance prescribed in the agreement. The operator may require payment in advance and is not required to provide the clearance until the person, firm, corporation, or association responsible for the work, activity, or function makes the payment.

(d) If the actual expense of providing the clearance is less than the amount paid, the operator of the high voltage overhead line shall refund the surplus amount.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 752.004. RESTRICTION ON ACTIVITIES NEAR LINES. (a) Unless a person, firm, corporation, or association effectively guards against danger by contact with the line as prescribed by Section 752.003, the person, firm, corporation, or association, either individually or through an agent or employee, may not perform a function or activity on land, a building, a highway, or other premises if at any time it is possible that the person performing the function or activity may:

(1) move or be placed within six feet of a high voltage overhead line while performing the function or activity; or

(2) bring any part of a tool, equipment, machine, or material within six feet of a high voltage overhead line while performing the function or activity.

(b) A person, firm, corporation, or association may not require an employee to perform a function or activity prohibited by Subsection (a).

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 752.005. RESTRICTION ON OPERATION OF MACHINERY AND PLACEMENT OF STRUCTURES NEAR LINES. Unless a person, firm, corporation, or association effectively guards against danger by contact with the line as prescribed by Section 752.003, the person, firm, corporation, or association, either individually or through an agent or employee, may not:

(1) erect, install, transport, or store all or any part of a house, building, or other structure within six feet of a high voltage overhead line;

(2) install, operate, transport, handle, or store all or any part of a tool, machine, or equipment within six feet of a high voltage overhead line; or

(3) transport, handle, or store all or any part of supplies or materials within six feet of a high voltage overhead line.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 752.007. CRIMINAL PENALTY. (a) A person, firm, corporation, or association or an agent or employee of a person, firm, corporation, or association commits an offense if the person, firm, corporation, association, agent, or employee violates this chapter.

(b) An offense under this section is punishable by a fine of not less than $100 or more than $1,000, confinement in jail for not more than one year, or both.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 752.008. LIABILITY FOR DAMAGES. If a violation of this chapter results in physical or electrical contact with a high voltage overhead line, the person, firm, corporation, or association that committed the violation is liable to the owner or operator of the line for all damages to the facilities and for all liability that the owner or operator incurs as a result of the contact.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.